New Jersey, session 222, A5291.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in this act: Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Wetlands means freshwater wetlands as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1987, c.156 (C.13:9B-3), or coastal wetlands as defined pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1970, c.272 (C.13:9A-2). 2.  a.  If, at any time, the department reevaluates or remaps wetlands areas within the State, the department shall notify all affected owners of real property of any changes to their propertys status as a wetlands area.  The notification shall include, at a minimum, information concerning whether the propertys, or a portion of a propertys, status as a wetlands area has changed, including, whether the property, or a portion of the property: (1) was previously designated as a wetlands area, but, after reevaluation or remapping by the department, is no longer designated as a wetlands area; or (2) was previously not designated as a wetlands area, but, after reevaluation or remapping by the department, is designated as a wetlands area. b.  The notification provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall also include a detailed description of how much of the property is designated to be a wetlands area, including a comparison of how the size of the wetlands area on the property has either increased or decreased as a result of the departments reevaluation or remapping. 3.  The department shall establish a process by which an owner of real property may appeal the departments designation of a property, or a portion of a property, as a wetlands area.  The appeals process shall be conducted in the manner provided for contested cases pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  The department shall include information related to the appeals process in any notifications provided pursuant to section 2 of this act and on its Internet website. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.